California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(iii) In multiples of one thousand dollars ($1,000) in the case of penalties greater than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(4) It shall be the duty of the bureau to receive complaints from consumers concerning covered products sold in California.

(e) The bureau may adopt regulations pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code)
 to carry out this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 592, Sec. 33.   (SB 861)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.5. Juvenile Products, Upholstered Furniture, and Mattresses [19100. - 19104.]

19100.

For the purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Chemical” has the same meaning as in subdivision (a) of Section 19094.

(b) “Consumer price index” has the same meaning as in subdivision (a) of Section 19094.

(c) (1) “Covered flame retardant chemical” means any chemical that meets both of the following criteria:

(A) A functional use for the chemical is to resist or inhibit the spread of fire or as a synergist to chemicals that resist or inhibit the spread of fire, including,
 but not limited to, any chemical for which the term “flame retardant” appears on the Occupational Safety and Health Administration substance safety data sheet pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 1910.1200 of Title 29 of the Code of Federal Regulations as it read on January 1, 2019.

(B) The chemical is one of the following:

(i) A halogenated, organophosphorus, organonitrogen, or nanoscale chemical.

(ii) A chemical defined as a “designated chemical” in Section 105440 of the Health and Safety Code.

(iii) A chemical listed on the Washington State Department of Ecology’s list of Chemicals of High Concern to Children in Section 173-334-130 of Title 173 of the
 Washington Administrative Code as of January 1, 2019, and identified as a flame retardant or as a synergist to flame retardants in the rationale for inclusion in the list.

(2) As used in this subdivision:

(A) “Halogenated chemical” means any chemical that contains one or more halogen elements, including fluorine, chlorine, bromine, or iodine.

(B) “Organophosphorus chemical” is any chemical that contains one or more carbon elements and one or more phosphorus elements.

(C) “Organonitrogen chemical” is any chemical that contains one or more carbon elements and one or more nitrogen elements.

(d) “Juvenile product” means a product subject to this chapter and designed for residential use by infants and children under 12 years of age, including, but not limited to, a bassinet, booster seat, changing pad, floor playmat, highchair, highchair pad, infant bouncer, infant carrier, infant seat, infant swing, infant walker, nursing pad, nursing pillow, playpen side pad, playard, portable hook-on chair, stroller, and children’s nap mat.

(e) Juvenile products do not include any of the following:

(1) Products that are not primarily intended for use in the home, such as products or components for motor vehicles, watercraft, aircraft, or other vehicles.

(2) Products subject to Part 571 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal
 Regulations regarding parts and products used in vehicles and aircraft.

(3) Products required to meet state flammability standards in Technical Bulletin 133, entitled “Flammability Test Procedure for Seating Furniture for Use in Public Occupancies.”

(4) Consumer electronic products that do not fall under the bureau’s jurisdiction for flammability standards.

(f) “Mattress” has the same definition as that term is defined in Section 1632.1 of Title 16 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(g) “Reupholstered furniture” means furniture whose original fabric, padding, decking, barrier material, foam, or other resilient filling has been replaced by a custom upholsterer, that
 has not been sold since the time of the replacement, and that is required to meet the flammability standards set forth in Technical Bulletin 117-2013 entitled “Requirements, Test Procedure and Apparatus for Testing the Smolder Resistance of Materials Used in Upholstered Furniture.” Reupholstered furniture shall not include products required to meet Technical Bulletin 133.

(h) “Upholstered furniture” has the same meaning as “covered products” does in subdivision (a) of Section 19094.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 188, Sec. 21.   (SB 826)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

19101.

(a) On or after January 1, 2020, a person, including a manufacturer, shall not sell or distribute in commerce in this state any new, not previously owned juvenile products, mattresses, or upholstered furniture that contains, or a constituent component of which contains, covered flame retardant chemicals at levels above 1,000 parts per million.

(b) On or after January 1, 2020, a custom upholsterer shall not repair, reupholster, recover, restore, or renew upholstered furniture or reupholstered furniture using replacement components that contain covered flame retardant chemicals at levels above 1,000 parts per million.

(c) The prohibitions in subdivisions (a) and (b) do not apply to the following:

(1) Electronic components of juvenile products, mattresses, reupholstered furniture, upholstered furniture, or any associated casing for those electronic components.

(2) Upholstered or reupholstered furniture components other than those identified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 19094.

(3) Thread or fiber when used for stitching mattress components together.

(4) Aramid fiber when used in fabric in the interior of a mattress or in fabric that covers the bottom (nonsleep surface) of a mattress that has a sleeping surface on only one side of the mattress.

(5) Modacrylic fiber without antimony trioxide or other covered flame retardant chemicals. 

(6) Until January 1, 2027, components of adult mattresses other than foam. As used in this paragraph, “adult mattresses” means mattresses other than toddler mattresses, crib mattresses, and other infant sleep products.

(d) (1) On or before October 1, 2025, the International Sleep Products Association shall submit to the bureau a quantitative health risk assessment of modacrylic fiber without antimony trioxide that was performed by an independent toxicologist who is board-certified by the American Board of Toxicology.

(2) The bureau shall post the assessment conducted pursuant to subdivision (a) on its internet website.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 25257.1 of the Health and Safety
 Code, this section shall not be construed to prohibit or restrict the authority of the Department of Toxic Substances Control to prioritize or take action on any products containing a covered flame retardant chemical in order to limit exposure to or reduce the level of hazard posed by these covered flame retardant chemicals.

(2) If the Department of Toxic Substances Control adopts a regulatory response described in the Safer Consumer Products Program (Chapter 55 (commencing with Section 69501) of Division 4.5 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations) governing the use of a flame retardant chemical in a product covered by this section, this section shall not apply to the use of that chemical upon the date that the department posts a notice on its internet website that it has adopted the regulatory response.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 461, Sec. 1.   (AB 1059)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

19101.5.

(a) On and after January 1, 2027, a person, including, but not limited to, a manufacturer, retailer, importer, or online seller, shall not manufacture, sell, offer, or distribute in commerce in this state any new, not previously owned juvenile product, mattress, or upholstered furniture that contains, or a constituent component of which contains, textile fiberglass.

(b) On and after January 1, 2027, a custom upholsterer shall not repair, reupholster, recover, restore, or renew any mattress, juvenile product, upholstered furniture, or reupholstered furniture using a replacement component that contains, or a constituent component of which contains, textile fiberglass.

(c) For
 purposes of this section, “textile fiberglass” means textile yarns whose composition includes one or more continuous glass filaments in a form suitable for knitting, weaving, or otherwise intertwining to form a textile fabric, but excludes the following:

(1) Thread or fiber when used for stitching mattress components together.

(2) Yarns in which the glass filaments are corespun or sheathed by another fiber.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 461, Sec. 2.   (AB 1059)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

19102.

The director may adopt regulations and rules necessary or appropriate for the implementation and enforcement of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 924, Sec. 2.   (AB 2998)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

19103.

(a) The bureau shall enforce and ensure compliance with Sections 19101 and 19101.5.

(b) (1) The bureau shall provide the Department of Toxic Substances Control with a selection of samples from products regulated under this article to test for compliance with Section 19101. The bureau shall select samples based on consultation with the Department of Toxic Substances Control, taking into account a range of manufacturers and types of products regulated under this article. The bureau shall integrate these testing requirements into the existing testing program described in subdivision (c) of Section 19094.

(2) (A) If the Department of Toxic Substances Control’s
 testing shows that any reupholstered furniture or new, not previously owned juvenile products, mattresses, or upholstered furniture is in violation of Section 19101, the bureau may assess fines for violations against manufacturers of the product for the violation. The bureau shall reimburse the Department of Toxic Substances Control for the cost of testing for the presence of covered flame retardant chemicals pursuant to this article.

(B) If a person continues to sell or distribute products in commerce in this state belonging to the same stock keeping unit (SKU) as products that do not comply with Sections 19101 and 19101.5, after notice of the violation is posted on the bureau’s internet website, the bureau may assess fines against the person for the continued sale or distribution of those products. The bureau shall make information about any citation issued pursuant to this section available to the public on its internet website, and shall
 develop a process for keeping interested persons informed about updates to notices of violation posted on the bureau’s internet website.

(c) A fine for a violation of this section shall be assessed in accordance with the following schedule:

(1) The fine for the first violation shall be not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000), but not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

(2) The fine for the second violation shall be not less than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), but not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(3) The fine for the third violation shall be not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000), but not more than seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500).

(4) The fine for any subsequent violation shall be not less than seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500), but not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(d) In determining the amount of the fine for a violation of this section, the bureau shall consider the following factors:

(1) The nature and severity of the violation.

(2) The good or bad faith of the cited person.

(3) The history of previous violations.

(4) Evidence that the violation was willful.

(5) The extent to which the cited person or entity has cooperated with the bureau.

(e) (1) The bureau shall adjust all minimum and maximum fines imposed by this section for inflation every five years.

(2) The adjustment shall be equivalent to the percentage, if any, that the Consumer Price Index at the time of adjustment exceeds the Consumer Price Index at the time this section goes into effect. Any increase determined under this paragraph shall be rounded as follows:

(A) In multiples of ten dollars ($10) in the case of penalties less than or equal to one hundred dollars ($100).

(B) In multiples of one hundred dollars ($100) in the case of penalties greater than one hundred dollars ($100), but less than or equal to one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(C) In multiples of one thousand dollars ($1,000) in
 the case of penalties greater than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(f) The bureau shall receive complaints from consumers concerning products regulated by this article sold in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 461, Sec. 3.   (AB 1059)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

19104.

(a) The International Sleep Products Association shall conduct a survey of mattress producers, including those that are registered with the bureau as of January 1, 2019, and shall submit a survey report to the bureau on or before January 31, 2020. The International Sleep Products Association shall conduct a new survey of mattress producers, including, but not limited to, registered mattress
 producers, and submit a survey report to the bureau on or before January 31, 2023, and every three years thereafter. A survey report shall include the following information for each unique combination of fibers or yarns, or both, and other materials in components used for meeting flammability standards, including, but not limited to, mattress components such as fire barriers or flame retardant chemical-treated batting or ticking or closing thread, used in the manufacture of new mattresses:

(1) A list of the fibers or any other materials used in each component used for meeting flammability standards other than chemicals
 identified under paragraph (2). The specific brand name or producer of the fire barrier need not be identified.

(2) The identity of any covered flame retardant chemical, as described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 19100, contained in each mattress component in an amount over 1000 parts per million, including, but not limited to, the Chemical Abstracts Service (CAS) number, if available.

(3) The method for incorporating the chemical in each mattress component used for meeting flammability standards, such as additive, reactive, or other method.

(4) The percentage of new mattress units in the United States that use the mattress component for meeting flammability
 standards.

(5) The types of mattresses that the mattress component is used with, such as innerspring, polyurethane foam, memory foam, gel foam, latex foam, fiber, air bladders, or the combination of those materials.

(b) All mattress producers of new mattresses that are registered with the bureau, commencing January 1, 2019, and thereafter, shall respond to the survey conducted by the International Sleep Products Association pursuant to subdivision (a). The International Sleep Products Association shall submit to the bureau a list of any producers who fail to respond to the survey. The bureau shall post the list of nonresponders on its Internet Web site.

(c) The bureau shall post the reports on its Internet
 Web site.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 924, Sec. 2.   (AB 2998)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Sanitization [19120. - 19132.]

19120.

The enforcement of all sanitization regulations pertaining to any article subject to this chapter is vested in the bureau. The bureau shall consult with the State Department of Health Services on any changes to the sanitization requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1448, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

19121.

Filthy or soiled articles of new or used bedding cannot be sold, offered or exposed for sale unless the fabric covering them is either properly cleaned or replaced by a new covering and then subjected to sanitization as provided for in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1448, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

19122.

A person shall not engage in the business of sanitizing any article of bedding or filling material, provided for in this chapter, without first having his or her sanitization equipment tested and approved by the bureau.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1448, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

19122.5.

Periodic tests and inspections shall be made by an authorized representative of the bureau, to determine whether or not the equipment and procedures used, comply with the requirements of the sanitization regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1448, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

19123.

The provisions of this article apply only to persons subject to the license provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 46.)
-------------------------------------------

19123.4.

Newly manufactured articles of bedding that contain any secondhand filling material shall be sanitized before they are offered or exposed for sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 401, Sec. 60.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

19123.5.

Every article of bedding and all filling material, repaired or renovated for resale or repaired or renovated for an owner but subsequently offered for sale shall be sanitized before being offered or exposed for sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1448, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

19123.6.

Every article of bedding to which any secondhand material has been added in the process of repairing, shall be sanitized in accordance with the provisions of the sanitization regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1448, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

19124.

Every person who receives for sanitization any bedding filling material shall sanitize all those articles and material in accordance with the sanitization regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1137, Sec. 47.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

19124.5.

Every person who sanitizes any bedding or filling material shall affix a sanitization label to the article or material in the manner prescribed by the bureau.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1448, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

19127.

The form, size and color of sanitization labels, and the material of which they are made shall be approved by the chief and as provided in the Label Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1448, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

19127.5.

Sanitization labels shall be sold only to sanitizers licensed under this chapter. Illegal possession of any sanitization label is a violation of this chapter. Void or mutilated labels shall be returned to the bureau.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1448, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

19127.6.

The sanitizer shall keep a record of all data and show the disposition of every label as required in the sanitization regulations. The records shall be accessible at all reasonable times to the chief and the inspectors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1448, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

19129.

Secondhand or used bedding and any secondhand or used article that can be used for sleeping purposes shall be sanitized under the provisions of this chapter before being sold.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 354, Sec. 67.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

19131.

Every article of bedding from any private or public hospital, jail or other institution, or which has been used by any person, suffering from an infectious or contagious disease, shall be sanitized before it is repaired or renovated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1448, Sec. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

19132.

New or sanitized articles of bedding or materials shall at all times be kept separate from any secondhand or used articles or materials that are unsanitized.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 354, Sec. 68.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Regulations [19150. - 19165.]

19150.

Every person who falsely advertises or misrepresents in any way any merchandise coming under the provisions of this chapter either directly or indirectly by any medium of advertising, including false statements made on the recognized California State labels or any other label or tag attached to the merchandise in question, is guilty of a violation of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 46.)
-------------------------------------------

19151.

No person licensed under this chapter shall advertise an article of upholstered furniture or bedding, or any part thereof, including, but not limited to, headboards, footboards, or frames of beds, using in such advertisement an illustration of an article that is not the article advertised unless the illustration is coupled with a statement that the article advertised is not as illustrated, the statement to be printed in type of at least nine-point bold caps or the equivalent thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1264, Sec. 84.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

19152.

No unconditional guaranty or replacement without charge relating to the quality of an article of upholstered furniture or bedding given by a person licensed under this chapter to a purchaser of such upholstered furniture or bedding shall exceed a period of five years from the date of sale.

This section does not preclude the offering of a warranty which would allow for a schedule of replacement charges based on period of use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1427.)
-------------------------------------------

19158.

Every person, upon receiving upholstered furniture or bedding for repairing or renovating shall securely affix, immediately, a tag of identification showing the owner’s or dealer’s name, address and the date upon which it was received. The tag shall remain affixed until the article is in the process of repair or renovation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1507.)
-------------------------------------------

19160.

The premises, delivery equipment, machinery, appliances and devices of all persons licensed under this chapter shall at all times be kept free from refuse, dirt contamination, insects or vermin.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 46.)
-------------------------------------------

19161.

(a) All mattresses and mattress sets manufactured for sale in this state shall be fire retardant. “Fire retardant,” as used in this section, means a product that meets the standards for resistance to open-flame test adopted by the United States Consumer Product Safety Commission and set forth in Section 1633 and following of Title 16 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The bureau may adopt regulations it deems necessary to implement those standards.

(b) All other bedding products that the bureau determines contribute to mattress bedding fires shall comply with regulations adopted by the bureau specifying that those products be resistant to open-flame
 ignition.

(c) All seating furniture sold or offered for sale by an importer, manufacturer, or wholesaler for use in this state, including any seating furniture sold to or offered for sale for use in a hotel, motel, or other place of public accommodation in this state, and reupholstered furniture to which filling materials are added, shall be fire retardant and shall be labeled in a manner specified by the bureau. This does not include furniture used exclusively for the purpose of physical fitness and exercise.

(d) Regulations adopted by the bureau for other bedding products shall not apply to any hotel, motel, bed and breakfast, inn, or similar transient lodging establishment that has an automatic fire extinguishing system that conforms to the specifications established in
 Section 904.1 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 188, Sec. 22.   (SB 826)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

19161.3.

All flexible polyurethane foam in the form of slabs, blocks, or sheets, or which is shredded (loose or packaged), except polyurethane foam sold for use as carpet underlayment and polyurethane foam which cannot reasonably be expected to be used in or as an article of furniture or a mattress, that is offered for sale to the general public at retail outlets in this state for noncommercial or nonmanufacturing purposes, shall be fire retardant. “Fire retardant” as used in this section, means a product that meets the regulations adopted by the bureau.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 983, Sec. 4.   Effective September 10, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

19161.5.

The chief of the bureau, subject to the approval of the Director of Consumer Affairs, may in his or her discretion exempt items of upholstered furniture which are deemed not to pose a serious fire hazard from the fire retardant requirements of Section 19161.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 925, Sec. 11.   Effective September 22, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

19162.

A custom upholsterer shall give to his or her customer a written estimate of the price of the labor and materials necessary for a specific job. No work shall be performed and no charges shall accrue before authorization to proceed is obtained from the customer, and no charge shall be made for work performed or materials supplied in excess of the estimated price without the oral or written consent of the customer obtained after it is determined that the estimated price is insufficient and before the work not estimated is performed or the materials not estimated are supplied. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a custom upholsterer to give an estimate if he or she does not agree to perform the requested work. As used in this section, “materials” includes structural units, filling materials,
 containers, and coverings. This section shall not prohibit the use of a written estimate in an electronic format.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 578, Sec. 31.   (SB 1483)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

19163.

All work to be performed by a custom upholsterer shall be recorded on a work order containing information required by rules and regulations adopted by the bureau and shall describe all work to be performed, all materials to be supplied, and the period within which the estimate shall remain effective. If any secondhand materials are to be supplied, the work order shall clearly identify them as secondhand. No work shall be performed and no charges shall accrue before authorization for the work and materials is obtained from the customer, and no charge shall be made for work performed or materials supplied different from those specified in the work order without the oral or written consent of the customer. One copy of the work order shall be given to the customer before any work is performed and one copy shall be
 retained by the custom upholsterer for at least one year. As used in this section, “materials” includes structural units, filling materials, containers, and coverings. If a copy of the work order is provided to the customer in an electronic format, an electronic copy of the work order shall be retained by the service dealer for the same retention period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 578, Sec. 32.   (SB 1483)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

19164.

The bureau may, by regulation, establish insulation material standards governing the quality of all insulation material sold or installed within this state, including those properties that affect the safety and thermal performance of insulation material during application and in the use intended. The standards shall specify the initial performance of the insulation material and the performance expected during the design life of the insulation material. Until the bureau has adopted these regulations, the regulations of the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission in effect on the effective date of this section relating to those standards shall remain in full force and effect. However, wherever those regulations specify that the commission
 shall perform an act, the bureau instead shall perform the act.

Prior to establishing the standards and procedures required by this chapter, the bureau shall conduct at least two public hearings, and shall invite the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, the State Fire Marshal, manufacturers, distributors, and licensed installers of insulation materials, and appropriate members of the public to participate in the hearings. Immediately upon adoption of the standards and procedures, the bureau shall provide a copy of the standards to the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, and the Contractors State License Board. Within 30 days after receipt of the bureau’s standards, the Contractors State License Board shall notify all state licensed contractors who install insulation of the standards.

Insulation standards adopted by the bureau, pursuant to this section, and by the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, pursuant to Section 25402 of the Public Resources Code, which are building standards, as defined in Section 25488.5 of the Public Resources Code, shall be submitted to the California Building Standards Commission for approval pursuant to, and are governed by, the California Building Standards Law (Part 2.5 (commencing with Section 18901) of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code). The building standards adopted by the bureau and published in the California Building Standards Code shall comply with, and be enforced as provided in, this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 312, Sec. 97.   (SB 1474)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

19165.

Insulation material may only be sold or installed in the state which has been certified by the manufacturer to have been tested in accordance with standards adopted by the bureau and which bears a visible bureau approved statement by the manufacturer certifying that the insulation material meets those standards and has been tested and approved by an approved testing laboratory. The testing criteria shall be designed to determine whether insulation materials have met or exceeded minimum established standards. The bureau shall publish and periodically update a directory of certified insulation, including the R-value. The bureau shall charge a fee of fifty dollars ($50) annually, for each certified product listed in the directory up to a maximum of five thousand dollars ($5,000) per manufacturer.

Within 180 days after the date of adoption of those standards, each manufacturer of insulation material shall develop and implement a quality assurance program. Each manufacturer shall keep a record of any testing performed pursuant to the program for a period of three years after it is performed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1456, Sec. 9.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Fees [19170. - 19174.5.]

19170.

(a) The fee imposed for the issuance and for the biennial renewal of each license granted under this chapter shall be set by the chief, with the approval of the director, at a sum not more nor less than that shown in the following table:Maximum
feeMinimum
feeImporter’s license $940$120Furniture and bedding manufacturer’slicense 940 120Wholesale furniture and beddingdealer’s license 675 120Supply dealer’s license 675 120Custom upholsterer’s license 450 80Sanitizer’s license 450 80Retail furniture and bedding dealer’s license 300 40Retail furniture dealer’s license
 150 20Retail bedding dealer’s license 150 20(b) Individuals who, in their own homes and without the employment of any other person, make, sell, advertise, or contract to make pillows, quilts, quilted pads, or comforters are exempt from the fee requirements imposed by subdivision (a). However, these individuals shall comply with all other provisions of this chapter.

(c) Retailers who only sell “used” and “antique” furniture as defined in Sections 19008.1 and 19008.2 are exempt from the fee requirements imposed by subdivision (a). Those retailers are also exempt from the other provisions of this chapter.

(d) A person who
 makes, sells, or advertises upholstered furniture and bedding as defined in Sections 19006 and 19007, and who also makes, sells, or advertises furniture used exclusively for the purpose of physical fitness and exercise, shall comply with the fee requirements imposed by subdivision (a).

(e) A person who has paid the required fee and who is licensed either as an upholstered furniture and bedding manufacturer or a custom upholsterer under this chapter shall not be required to additionally pay the fee for a sanitizer’s license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 187, Sec. 3.   (AB 1175)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

19170.3.

The annual fee for an insulation manufacturing license shall be fixed by the bureau in an amount not less than one thousand eight hundred fifty dollars ($1,850) but not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19170 (as added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1456) by Stats. 1986, Ch. 248, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

19170.5.

(a) Except as provided in Section 19170.3, licenses issued under this chapter expire two years from the date of issuance. To renew his or her license, a licensee shall, on or before the date on which it would otherwise expire, apply for renewal on a form prescribed by the chief, and pay the fees prescribed by Sections 19170 and 19213.1. If a licensee fails to renew his or her license before its expiration, a delinquency fee of 20 percent, but not more than one hundred dollars ($100), notwithstanding the provisions of Section 163.5, shall
 be added to the renewal fee. If the renewal fee and delinquency fee are not paid within 90 days after expiration of a license, the licensee shall be assessed an additional penalty fee of 30 percent of the renewal fee.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a licensee may renew an expired license within six years after expiration of the license by filing an application for renewal on a form prescribed by the bureau, and paying all accrued renewal, delinquent, and penalty fees.

(c) A license that is not renewed within six years of its expiration shall not be renewed, restored, reinstated, or reissued, but the holder of the license may apply for and obtain a new license if both of the following requirements are satisfied:

(1) No fact, circumstance, or condition exists which would justify denial of licensure
 under Section 480.

(2) The licensee pays all renewal, delinquency, and penalty fees that have accrued since the date on which the license was last renewed.

(d) The bureau may impose conditions on any license issued pursuant to subdivision (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 354, Sec. 69.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

19172.

A person may not obtain a new license of the same class as the license held during the last preceding license period, but may renew the license previously held by him or her on payment of the renewal fee and delinquency fee in effect on the last regular renewal date before the date on which he or she applies for renewal provided the license has not been canceled in accordance with Section 19170.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1264, Sec. 87.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

19173.5.

Section 11002 of the Government Code authorizes the use of the United States postal cancellation on the envelope in which the fee is mailed, as the date of payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

19174.

All fees collected under this chapter shall be reported to the Controller and paid to the Treasurer and credited to the Household Goods and Services Fund, to be expended only for the purposes of the bureau and in carrying out this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 508, Sec. 36.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

19174.5.

(a) All moneys in the Home Furnishings and Thermal Insulation Fund shall be transferred to the Household Goods and Services Fund by July 1, 2026. On July 1, 2026, the Home Furnishing and Thermal Insulation Fund shall be abolished.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until December 31,
 2026, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 508, Sec. 37.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of December 31, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Enforcement [19200. - 19214.]

19200.

The chief or any inspector shall have access to the premises, equipment, materials, partly finished and finished articles and records of any person subject to the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 787.)
-------------------------------------------

19200.5.

(a) The chief or any inspector may open any articles of upholstered furniture or bedding, including pillows or cushions belonging to or forming a part thereof, or insulation for the purpose of inspecting concealed filling material and may take either the entire article or samples of filling material or insulation in such quantities as may be necessary for analysis.

(b) The bureau shall reimburse the manufacturer, distributor, or retailer for the actual cost of any article or sample of filling material or insulation taken for analysis under subdivision (a) unless the article or sample is found to be in violation of this chapter or any regulation adopted by the bureau.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 90, Sec. 1.   (AB 1443)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

19201.

The chief or any inspector may determine the fitness of any secondhand or damaged article of bedding or filling material, for sanitization and sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1448, Sec. 27.)
-------------------------------------------

19202.

The bureau may condemn, withhold from sale, seize, or destroy any upholstered furniture or bedding or any filling material or insulation which is found to be in violation of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1456, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

19203.

The tag to be affixed to any article of condemned upholstered furniture or bedding, or any material or insulation, by an inspector shall be a red tag and shall contain such information as may be required by the chief.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1456, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

19204.

Every person who removes, or causes to be removed, any tag or device placed upon any upholstered furniture or bedding or any material or insulation, by an inspector is guilty of a violation of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1456, Sec. 14.)